Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.220

Information not required when nonissuer distribution.

In the case of a nonissuer distribution, information may not be required under RCW 21.20.210 unless it is known to the person filing the registration statement or to the persons on whose behalf the distribution is to be made, or can be furnished by them without unreasonable effort or expense.

[ 1959 c 282 s 22.]